Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Chapter 4.
Probation and Parole.

Article 4.

Uniform Act for Out-of-State Parolee Supervision.

53.1-166.Governor to execute compact.

53.1-167.Form of compact.

Article 5.

Virginia Model Interstate Parole

and Probation Hearings Act.

53.1-168.Procedure when reincarceration of out-of-state parolee or probationer should be considered.

53.1-169.Who may hold hearings; procedures therefor.

53.1-170.Rights of parolee or probationer at hearing.

53.1-171.Record of hearing.

53.1-172.Hearings for parolees, probationers or felons serving a period of postrelease supervision being supervised in another state.

53.1-173.Preliminary hearings for out-of-state parolees in Virginia.

53.1-174.Preliminary hearings by other states.

53.1-175.Revocation of parole by Virginia.

53.1-176.Revocation of parole by other states.

Article 6.

The Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders.

53.1-176.1.Enactment of the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders.

53.1-176.2.Short title; Governor to execute; form of compact.

53.1-176.3.Virginia State Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision.